Utah statutes.
34A-2-413.   Permanent total disability -- Amount of payments --
Rehabilitation.
(1) (a)  In the case of a permanent total disability resulting from an
industrial accident or occupational disease, the employee shall receive
compensation as outlined in this section.
(b)  To establish entitlement to permanent total disability compensation, the
employee must prove by a preponderance of evidence that:
(i)  the employee sustained a significant impairment or combination of
impairments as a result of the industrial accident or occupational disease
that gives rise to the permanent total disability entitlement;
(ii)  the employee is permanently totally disabled; and
(iii)  the industrial accident or occupational disease is the direct cause of
the employee's permanent total disability.
(c)  To establish that an employee is permanently totally disabled the
employee must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(i)  the employee is not gainfully employed;
(ii)  the employee has an impairment or combination of impairments that limit
the employee's ability to do basic work activities;
(iii)  the industrial or occupationally caused impairment or combination of
impairments prevent the employee from performing the essential functions of
the work activities for which the employee has been qualified until the time
of the industrial accident or occupational disease that is the basis for the
employee's permanent total disability claim; and
(iv)  the employee cannot perform other work reasonably available, taking into
consideration the employee's:
(A)  age;
(B)  education;
(C)  past work experience;
(D)  medical capacity; and
(E)  residual functional capacity.
(d)  Evidence of an employee's entitlement to disability benefits other than
those provided under this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease
Act, if relevant:
(i)  may be presented to the commission;
(ii)  is not binding; and
(iii)  creates no presumption of an entitlement under this chapter and Chapter
3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
(e)  In determining under Subsections (1)(b) and (c) whether an employee
cannot perform other work reasonably available, the following may not be
considered:
(i)  whether the employee is incarcerated in a facility operated by or
contracting with a federal, state, county, or municipal government to house a
criminal offender in either a secure or nonsecure setting; or
(ii)  whether the employee is not legally eligible to be employed because of a
reason unrelated to the impairment or combination of impairments.
(2)  For permanent total disability compensation during the initial 312-week
entitlement, compensation is 66-2/3% of the employee's average weekly wage at
the time of the injury, limited as follows:
(a)  compensation per week may not be more than 85% of the state average
weekly wage at the time of the injury;
(b) (i)  subject to Subsection (2)(b)(ii), compensation per week may not be
less than the sum of $45 per week and:
(A)  $5 for a dependent spouse; and
(B)  $5 for each dependent child under the age of 18 years, up to a maximum of
four dependent minor children; and
(ii)  the amount calculated under Subsection (2)(b)(i) may not exceed:
(A)  the maximum established in Subsection (2)(a); or
(B)  the average weekly wage of the employee at the time of the injury; and
(c)  after the initial 312 weeks, the minimum weekly compensation rate under
Subsection (2)(b) is 36% of the current state average weekly wage, rounded to
the nearest dollar.
(3)  This Subsection (3) applies to claims resulting from an accident or
disease arising out of and in the course of the employee's employment on or
before June 30, 1994.
(a)  The employer or its insurance carrier is liable for the initial 312 weeks
of permanent total disability compensation except as outlined in Section
34A-2-703 as in effect on the date of injury.
(b)  The employer or its insurance carrier may not be required to pay
compensation for any combination of disabilities of any kind, as provided in
this section and Sections 34A-2-410 through 34A-2-412 and Part 5, Industrial
Noise, in excess of the amount of compensation payable over the initial 312
weeks at the applicable permanent total disability compensation rate under
Subsection (2).
(c)  The Employers' Reinsurance Fund shall for an overpayment of compensation
described in Subsection (3)(b), reimburse the overpayment:
(i)  to the employer or its insurance carrier; and
(ii)  out of the Employers' Reinsurance Fund's liability to the employee.
(d)  After an employee receives compensation from the employee's employer, its
insurance carrier, or the Employers' Reinsurance Fund for any combination of
disabilities amounting to 312 weeks of compensation at the applicable
permanent total disability compensation rate, the Employers' Reinsurance Fund
shall pay all remaining permanent total disability compensation.
(e)  Employers' Reinsurance Fund payments shall commence immediately after the
employer or its insurance carrier satisfies its liability under this
Subsection (3) or Section 34A-2-703.
(4)  This Subsection (4) applies to claims resulting from an accident or
disease arising out of and in the course of the employee's employment on or
after July 1, 1994.
(a)  The employer or its insurance carrier is liable for permanent total
disability compensation.
(b)  The employer or its insurance carrier may not be required to pay
compensation for any combination of disabilities of any kind, as provided in
this section and Sections 34A-2-410 through 34A-2-412 and Part 5, Industrial
Noise, in excess of the amount of compensation payable over the initial 312
weeks at the applicable permanent total disability compensation rate under
Subsection (2).
(c)  The employer or its insurance carrier may recoup the overpayment of
compensation described in Subsection (4) by reasonably offsetting the
overpayment against future liability paid before or after the initial 312
weeks.
(5) (a)  Subject to Subsection (5)(b) and notwithstanding the minimum rate
established in Subsection (2), an employer, its insurance carrier, or the
Employers' Reinsurance Fund, after an employee receives compensation from the
employer or the employer's insurance carrier for any combination of
disabilities amounting to 312 weeks of compensation at the applicable total
disability compensation rate, shall reduce the compensation payable:
(i)  to the extent allowable by law;
(ii)  by the dollar amount of 50% of the Social Security retirement benefits
the employee is eligible to receive for a four week period as of the first day
the employee is eligible to receive a Social Security retirement benefit; and
(iii)  that the employee receives during the same period as the Social
Security retirement benefits.
(b) (i)  An employer, its insurance carrier, or the Employers' Reinsurance
Fund may not reduce compensation payable under this section on or after May 5,
2008, to an employee by an amount related to a cost-of-living increase to the
Social Security retirement benefit that the employee is first eligible to
receive for a four week period, notwithstanding whether the employee is
injured on or before May 4, 2008.
(ii)  For purposes of an employee whose compensation payable is reduced under
this Subsection (5) on or before May 4, 2008, the reduction is limited to the
amount of the reduction as of May 4, 2008.
(6) (a)  A finding by the commission of permanent total disability is not
final, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, until:
(i)  an administrative law judge reviews a summary of reemployment activities
undertaken pursuant to Chapter 8a, Utah Injured Worker Reemployment Act;
(ii)  the employer or its insurance carrier submits to the administrative law
judge:
(A)  a reemployment plan as prepared by a qualified rehabilitation provider
reasonably designed to return the employee to gainful employment; or
(B)  notice that the employer or its insurance carrier will not submit a plan;
and
(iii)  the administrative law judge, after notice to the parties, holds a
hearing, unless otherwise stipulated, to:
(A)  consider evidence regarding rehabilitation; and
(B)  review any reemployment plan submitted by the employer or its insurance
carrier under Subsection (6)(a)(ii).
(b)  Before commencing the procedure required by Subsection (6)(a), the
administrative law judge shall order:
(i)  the initiation of permanent total disability compensation payments to
provide for the employee's subsistence; and
(ii)  the payment of any undisputed disability or medical benefits due the
employee.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (6)(a), an order for payment of benefits
described in Subsection (6)(b) is considered a final order for purposes of
Section 34A-2-212.
(d)  The employer or its insurance carrier shall be given credit for any
disability payments made under Subsection (6)(b) against its ultimate
disability compensation liability under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act.
(e)  An employer or its insurance carrier may not be ordered to submit a
reemployment plan.  If the employer or its insurance carrier voluntarily
submits a plan, the plan is subject to Subsections (6)(e)(i) through (iii).
(i)  The plan may include, but not require an employee to pay for:
(A)  retraining;
(B)  education;
(C)  medical and disability compensation benefits;
(D)  job placement services; or
(E)  incentives calculated to facilitate reemployment.
(ii)  The plan shall include payment of reasonable disability compensation to
provide for the employee's subsistence during the rehabilitation process.
(iii)  The employer or its insurance carrier shall diligently pursue the
reemployment plan.  The employer's or insurance carrier's failure to
diligently pursue the reemployment plan is cause for the administrative law
judge on the administrative law judge's own motion to make a final decision of
permanent total disability.
(f)  If a preponderance of the evidence shows that successful rehabilitation
is not possible, the administrative law judge shall order that the employee be
paid weekly permanent total disability compensation benefits.
(g)  If a preponderance of the evidence shows that pursuant to a reemployment
plan, as prepared by a qualified rehabilitation provider and presented under
Subsection (6)(e), an employee could immediately or without unreasonable delay
return to work but for the following, an administrative law judge shall order
that the employee be denied the payment of weekly permanent total disability
compensation benefits:
(i)  incarceration in a facility operated by or contracting with a federal,
state, county, or municipal government to house a criminal offender in either
a secure or nonsecure setting; or
(ii)  not being legally eligible to be employed because of a reason unrelated
to the impairment or combination of impairments.
(7) (a)  The period of benefits commences on the date the employee became
permanently totally disabled, as determined by a final order of the commission
based on the facts and evidence, and ends:
(i)  with the death of the employee; or
(ii)  when the employee is capable of returning to regular, steady work.
(b)  An employer or its insurance carrier may provide or locate for a
permanently totally disabled employee reasonable, medically appropriate, part-
time work in a job earning at least minimum wage, except that the employee may
not be required to accept the work to the extent that it would disqualify the
employee from Social Security disability benefits.
(c)  An employee shall:
(i)  fully cooperate in the placement and employment process; and
(ii)  accept the reasonable, medically appropriate, part-time work.
(d)  In a consecutive four-week period when an employee's gross income from
the work provided under Subsection (7)(b) exceeds $500, the employer or
insurance carrier may reduce the employee's permanent total disability
compensation by 50% of the employee's income in excess of $500.
(e)  If a work opportunity is not provided by the employer or its insurance
carrier, a permanently totally disabled employee may obtain medically
appropriate, part-time work subject to the offset provisions of Subsection
(7)(d).
(f) (i)  The commission shall establish rules regarding the part-time work and
offset.
(ii)  The adjudication of disputes arising under this Subsection (7) is
governed by Part 8, Adjudication.
(g)  The employer or its insurance carrier has the burden of proof to show
that medically appropriate part-time work is available.
(h)  The administrative law judge may:
(i)  excuse an employee from participation in any work:
(A)  that would require the employee to undertake work exceeding the
employee's:
(I)  medical capacity; or
(II)  residual functional capacity; or
(B)  for good cause; or
(ii)  allow the employer or its insurance carrier to reduce permanent total
disability benefits as provided in Subsection (7)(d) when reasonable,
medically appropriate, part-time work is offered, but the employee fails to
fully cooperate.
(8)  When an employee is rehabilitated or the employee's rehabilitation is
possible but the employee has some loss of bodily function, the award shall be
for permanent partial disability.
(9)  As determined by an administrative law judge, an employee is not entitled
to disability compensation, unless the employee fully cooperates with any
evaluation or reemployment plan under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act.  The administrative law judge shall dismiss without
prejudice the claim for benefits of an employee if the administrative law
judge finds that the employee fails to fully cooperate, unless the
administrative law judge states specific findings on the record justifying
dismissal with prejudice.
(10) (a)  The loss or permanent and complete loss of the use of the following
constitutes total and permanent disability that is compensated according to
this section:
(i)  both hands;
(ii)  both arms;
(iii)  both feet;
(iv)  both legs;
(v)  both eyes; or
(vi)  any combination of two body members described in this Subsection
(10)(a).
(b)  A finding of permanent total disability pursuant to Subsection (10)(a) is
final.
(11) (a)  An insurer or self-insured employer may periodically reexamine a
permanent total disability claim, except those based on Subsection (10), for
which the insurer or self-insured employer had or has payment responsibility
to determine whether the employee remains permanently totally disabled.
(b)  Reexamination may be conducted no more than once every three years after
an award is final, unless good cause is shown by the employer or its insurance
carrier to allow more frequent reexaminations.
(c)  The reexamination may include:
(i)  the review of medical records;
(ii)  employee submission to one or more reasonable medical evaluations;
(iii)  employee submission to one or more reasonable rehabilitation
evaluations and retraining efforts;
(iv)  employee disclosure of Federal Income Tax Returns;
(v)  employee certification of compliance with Section 34A-2-110; and
(vi)  employee completion of one or more sworn affidavits or questionnaires
approved by the division.
(d)  The insurer or self-insured employer shall pay for the cost of a
reexamination with appropriate employee reimbursement pursuant to rule for
reasonable travel allowance and per diem as well as reasonable expert witness
fees incurred by the employee in supporting the employee's claim for permanent
total disability benefits at the time of reexamination.
(e)  If an employee fails to fully cooperate in the reasonable reexamination
of a permanent total disability finding, an administrative law judge may order
the suspension of the employee's permanent total disability benefits until the
employee cooperates with the reexamination.
(f) (i)  If the reexamination of a permanent total disability finding reveals
evidence that reasonably raises the issue of an employee's continued
entitlement to permanent total disability compensation benefits, an insurer or
self-insured employer may petition the Division of Adjudication for a
rehearing on that issue.  The insurer or self-insured employer shall include
with the petition, documentation supporting the insurer's or self-insured
employer's belief that the employee is no longer permanently totally disabled.
(ii)  If the petition under Subsection (11)(f)(i) demonstrates good cause, as
determined by the Division of Adjudication, an administrative law judge shall
adjudicate the issue at a hearing.
(iii)  Evidence of an employee's participation in medically appropriate, part-
time work may not be the sole basis for termination of an employee's permanent
total disability entitlement, but the evidence of the employee's participation
in medically appropriate, part-time work under Subsection (7) may be
considered in the reexamination or hearing with other evidence relating to the
employee's status and condition.
(g)  In accordance with Section 34A-1-309, the administrative law judge may
award reasonable attorney fees to an attorney retained by an employee to
represent the employee's interests with respect to reexamination of the
permanent total disability finding, except if the employee does not prevail,
the attorney fees shall be set at $1,000.  The attorney fees awarded shall be
paid by the employer or its insurance carrier in addition to the permanent
total disability compensation benefits due.
(h)  During the period of reexamination or adjudication, if the employee fully
cooperates, each insurer, self-insured employer, or the Employers' Reinsurance
Fund shall continue to pay the permanent total disability compensation
benefits due the employee.
(12)  If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision to
any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this section is
given effect without the invalid provision or application.
